Georgia, session 2025_26, HB443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 27-2-23 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to license, permit,
tag, and stamp fees, is amended by adding new subparagraphs to paragraph (4), revising
paragraph (11), and adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
"(K) Resident reef/migratory fish Annual 10.00
endorsement
(L) Nonresident reef/migratory fish Annual 20.00"
endorsement
- 1 -

LC 44 3166S
"(11) For wildlife that may be legally taken by recreational or commercial fishing gear
as authorized in this title or by board rule, the board may designate which species of
wildlife or species grouping of wildlife require a recreational or commercial fishing
species endorsement for a fee shown in subparagraphs (K) and (L) of paragraph (4) or
subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (6) of this Code section in addition to the
required recreational or commercial fishing license. Each species or group of species so
designated shall require a separate recreational or commercial fishing species
endorsement."
"(12.1) Any fees collected pursuant to subparagraphs (K) and (L) of paragraph (4) of this
Code section shall be retained by the department pursuant to Code Section 45-12-92.1."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 2 -